Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2818.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1233, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1233. Prohibited acts No person shall: 1. Retain or employ another person to promote or oppose legislation for compensation contingent in whole or in part on the passage or defeat of any legislation, or the approval or veto of any legislation by the governor, and no person shall accept employment or render service for compensation on a contingent basis. 2. Lobby the legislature for compensation within one year after the person ceases to be a member of the senate or house of representatives. 3. In any manner improperly seek to influence the vote of any member of the legislature through communication with that member's employer. 4. Lobby the public body that employed the person in a capacity having a significant procurement role as defined in section 41-741 in the procurement of materials, services or construction within one year after the person ceases to be employed by the public body. 5. Lobby the legislature if the person has been a paid employee of or received compensation from a candidate committee, a political action committee or an independent expenditure committee during the one-year period immediately preceding the beginning of a regular session of that legislature. For the purposes of this paragraph, "candidate committee" and "political action committee" have the same meanings prescribed in section 16-901. END_STATUTE